Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2459.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *( 77) The sale at retail or use of exercise equipment during the exclusion period to an individual purchaser for nonbusiness purposes. The department shall publish a notice on its publicly 12345678910111213141516171819202122 accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause:(i) "Exercise equipment" means any apparatus, machine, tool or wearable item used during physical activity to enhance the strength, conditioning, flexibility or rehabilitation effects of exercise.(ii) "Exclusion period" means the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause.(iii) "Purchaser" means an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2459PN3273 - 2 - 123456789101112131415